Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 9 Continuances

Cross references. —

For provision that offer to confess judgment is not cause for continuance, see §

1-10-105

.

As to continuances in the municipal courts of cities of the first class, see §

5-6-209

.

Editor's notes. —

Section 3, ch. 17, Laws 1876, which was last compiled as § 1-70, W.S. 1957, provided for applicability of the act to criminal cases. However, even though ch. 188, Laws 1977, omitted this section from this chapter, notes from criminal cases have been retained in the annotations.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

17 Am. Jur. 2d Continuance §§ 1 to 64.

Prejudicial effect, in civil case, of denial of continuance to call nonappearing witness whom adversary has been expected to call, 39 ALR2d 1445.

Party litigant's absence in civil case because of illness of relative or member of family as ground for continuance, 47 ALR2d 1058.

Withdrawal or discharge of counsel in civil case as ground for continuance, 48 ALR2d 1155.

Counsel's absence because of attendance on legislature as ground for continuance, 49 ALR2d 1073.

Amendment of pleading before trial with respect to amount or nature of relief sought as ground for continuance, 56 ALR2d 650.

Continuance of civil case because of illness or death of counsel, 67 ALR2d 497.

Continuance of civil case because of illness or death of party, 68 ALR2d 470.

Hostile sentiment or prejudice as ground for continuance in civil case, 68 ALR2d 540.

Motion for continuance as remedy for infringement of right of accused to communicate with his attorney, 5 ALR3d 1360.

Attorney's misrepresentation to court of his state of health or other personal matter in seeking trial delay as ground for disciplinary action, 61 ALR4th 1216.

17 C.J.S. Continuances § 1 et seq.

§ 1-9-101.
Contents of affidavit showing lack of evidence or absent witness;
procedure if evidence admitted.

A motion to postpone the trial of a case because of the lack of evidence shall be supported by affidavit showing:

The materiality of the evidence expected to be obtained;

That due diligence has been used to obtain the evidence; and

Where it is expected the evidence may be found.

If the postponement is because of an absent witness, the affidavit shall also state:

Where the witness resides, if known;

The probability of procuring the testimony within a reasonable time;

That absence of the witness was not procured by the act or connivance of the party seeking the postponement, nor by others at his request or with his knowledge or consent;

The facts the witness is expected to prove and that affiant believes the facts as stated to be true; and

Such facts cannot be proven by any other witness whose testimony can be as readily procured.

If the adverse party consents that, on the trial, the facts stated in the affidavit will be taken as true, if the evidence is written or documentary, or in case of an absent witness that the witness will testify to the facts stated in the affidavit as true, the trial shall not be postponed for that cause. The party against whom the evidence is offered may impeach the evidence of an absent witness the same as when the witness is present or his deposition is used.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 17, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 3397; R.S. 1899, § 4279; C.S. 1910, § 5139; C.S. 1920, § 6416; R.S. 1931, § 89-901; C.S. 1945, § 3-2001; W.S. 1957, § 1-68; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Section applies to motions for continuance made before trial.

Sims v. State, 530 P.2d 1176,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 1975).

Granting of continuance is in discretion of trial court.

Holly Sugar Corp. v. Perez, 508 P.2d 595,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1973).

Refusal of continuance on ground of party's absence was discretionary where it was not shown party did not have notice of trial date or could not return in time. Eldridge v. Rogers, 40 Wyo. 89, 275 P. 101,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1929).

As are subsequent continuances. —

Disposition of second or further continuances for absent witnesses or evidence rests in court's discretion; refusal is ordinarily proper. Jegendorf v. Jegendorf, 61 Wyo. 277, 157 P.2d 280,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1945).

Issue regarding continuance raised below. —

Counsel's statement, “If we can't continue the matter until such time as he can be here, then we would rest” was sufficient to raise the question of abuse of discretion for the supreme court's consideration, using the standard of review for motions for continuance. Carlson v. BMW Indus. Serv., 744 P.2d 1383,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 532

(Wyo. 1987).

Basis for judging abuse of discretion on appeal. —

Appellate court must not judge the matter of abuse of discretion in granting a continuance on the basis of showings made on appeal, but on the basis of showings made to the trial court when application for continuance was made. Holly Sugar Corp. v. Perez, 508 P.2d 595,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1973).

Court did not abuse discretion

in disallowing second continuance to husband in wife's divorce action to permit taking out-of-state deposition for purpose of rebutting medical testimony where satisfactory reasons appeared. Jegendorf v. Jegendorf, 61 Wyo. 277, 157 P.2d 280,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1945).

Refusal for lack of diligence. —

Under this section a continuance will be refused for lack of due diligence where a subpoena for the absent witnesses has not been asked for. Kearney Stone Works v. McPherson, 5 Wyo. 178, 38 P. 920,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1895).

It was not error to refuse a continuance under this section, applied for on the ground of the absence of a witness residing in another state, where defendant had relied on his promise to attend and made no effort to secure his testimony by deposition or his attendance by legal process. Chapman v. First Nat'l Bank, 26 Wyo. 138, 181 P. 360,

1919 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 26 Wyo. 156, 182 P. 91 (Wyo. 1919).

Denying continuance to secure witness is not error where party made no attempt to obtain deposition and presented no affidavit. Hinton v. Saul, 37 Wyo. 78, 259 P. 185,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 1927).

Reasonable effort to secure witness' presence required. —

Due diligence, in the context of a missing witness, is not satisfied when a party simply secures agreement from the witness that he will attend trial, but a party must make every reasonable effort to insure that his witness will be present. This can include alternate travel plans or schedules and the use of depositions to preserve important testimony. Carlson v. BMW Indus. Serv., 744 P.2d 1383,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 532

(Wyo. 1987).

In defendant's sexual assault case, the court properly denied his
motion for a continuance to allow time to locate a witness because
defendant failed to establish that the witness could be located and
his testimony procured within a reasonable time, the unavailable testimony
lacked materiality, and the potential testimony was simply not compelling.
Huckfeldt v. State, 2013 WY 29, 297 P.3d 97,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 2013).

New matter

in an amended petition which did not increase defendant's obligation under the facts alleged in the original does not entitle defendant to a continuance. Pullman Co. v. Finley, 20 Wyo. 456, 125 P. 380,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1912).

Right to amend affidavit. —

Under this section, defendant asked for a continuance in order to introduce a witness who would testify that the prosecuting witness had made statements indicating that the prosecution was instituted out of malice and that defendant was not guilty. Defendant's affidavit failed to show the time and place of the statements of the prosecuting witness. Defense had right to amend affidavit in that respect. McNealley v. State, 5 Wyo. 59, 36 P. 824,

1894 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1894).

Admission as to testimony of absent witnesses. —

Under this section, defendant's motion for continuance was properly overruled where plaintiff made admission as to the testimony of the absent witnesses. Baldwin v. McDonald, 24 Wyo. 108, 156 P. 27,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1916).

Denying continuance for absent witnesses held not error where prosecuting attorney admitted that witnesses would testify as claimed, if present. State v. Aragon, 41 Wyo. 308, 285 P. 803,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1930).

Absence of attorney not ground. —

The absence of defendant's attorney in an adjoining county, attending court, is no ground for a continuance. Van Horn v. State, 5 Wyo. 501, 40 P. 964,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1895).

Continuance should be granted when parties in another case
in another state. —

The trial court abused its discretion in refusing to grant a continuance when the defendants were involved in another case in another state and were unable to attend the trial. Even though the defendants were unable to file affidavits in support of their motion, their presence as parties was completely essential to the proper presentation of their case. If the plaintiffs and court personnel were inconvenienced by the delay, assessing costs may have been more appropriate than denying the defendants the right to defend their action in court. Tomash v. Evans, 704 P.2d 1296,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 530

(Wyo. 1985).

Quoted

in

Dreyer v. State, 540 P.2d 541,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 165

(Wyo. 1975).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Permissibility of testimony by telephone in state trial, 85 ALR4th 476.

Continuance of case because of illness of expert witness. 18 A.L.R.6th 509.

§ 1-9-102.
Continuance for good cause.

Any court, for good cause
shown may continue any action at any stage of the proceedings at the
cost of the applicant, to be paid as the court shall direct.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 17, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 3398; R.S. 1899, § 4280; C.S. 1910, § 5140; C.S. 1920, § 6417; R.S. 1931, § 89-902; C.S. 1945, § 3-2002; W.S. 1957, § 1-69; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Denial appropriate where moving party is at fault.

District court did not abuse its discretion when it denied a mother’s motions for continuance because the mother’s failure to appear at the hearing she requested was sufficient reason to deny her motion for continuance. Bacus v. Coon, 2020 WY 2, 454 P.3d 945,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 2020).

District court did not abuse its discretion when it denied a wife’s motion for a continuance of a divorce trial because the need for the continuance was caused by the wife and the court’s decision was not so arbitrary as to deny the wife due process. When the wife asked for a second continuance, the husband had filed pretrial disclosures and subpoenas to witnesses had issued, nearly ten months had passed from the death of the wife’s first attorney; and more than five months had passed from the withdrawal of the wife’s second attorney. Conzelman v. Conzelman, 2019 WY 123, 453 P.3d 773,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 2019).

Granting or denial of motion for continuance is matter for discretion

of the trial court. Hays v. State, 522 P.2d 1004,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 209

(Wyo. 1974).

The granting or refusing of a request for a continuance of a trial of a case is ordinarily a matter within the sound discretion of the trial court under the circumstances of each case. Glover v. Berger, 72 Wyo. 221, 263 P.2d 498,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1953); Armed Forces Coop. Insuring Ass'n v. Department of Ins., 622 P.2d 1318,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 332

(Wyo. 1980), overruled in part, Torres v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2004 WY 92, 95 P.3d 794,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 2004).

Abuse of discretion. —

A trial judge who grants a continuance of a case, civil or criminal, set for trial based upon the mere request, whim or convenience of counsel without substantial or legal reason for such continuance is himself guilty of a species of discretionary abuse. Hays v. State, 522 P.2d 1004,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 209

(Wyo. 1974).

Trial court may not grant continuance based on mere whim,

request or the convenience to counsel without a substantial factual or legal reason for doing so. Carlson v. BMW Indus. Serv., 744 P.2d 1383,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 532

(Wyo. 1987).

Continuance should be granted when parties in another case
in another state. —

The trial court abused its discretion in refusing to grant a continuance when the defendants were involved in another case in another state and were unable to attend the trial. Even though the defendants were unable to file affidavits in support of their motion, their presence as parties was completely essential to the proper presentation of their case. If the plaintiffs and court personnel were inconvenienced by the delay, assessing costs may have been more appropriate than denying the defendants the right to defend their action in court. Tomash v. Evans, 704 P.2d 1296,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 530

(Wyo. 1985).

But not when alleged “new issues” either perfunctorily raised
or previously raised. —

The court did not abuse its discretion in denying the husband's motion for a continuance of his divorce action on the alleged grounds that his wife, through her counterclaim filed nine days before trial, injected new issues into the case. The issues raised in the counterclaim — a request for divorce, and a request for alimony and certain property — were either raised perfunctorily or were previously raised in the answer to the complaint. Smith v. Smith, 704 P.2d 1319,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 545

(Wyo. 1985).

Nor when party waits over a month to obtain counsel. —

There was no error in the trial court's denial of a motion for continuance filed by a party who waited over a month after the trial date was set to obtain counsel. Shanor v. Engineering, Inc., 705 P.2d 858,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 556

(Wyo. 1985).

Denial appropriate where moving party is at fault. —

Trial court properly denied a husband's request for a continuance because his counsel's late withdrawal was due to the husband's failure to cooperate and his obstruction of an orderly progression of a divorce action. Byrd v. Mahaffey, 2003 WY 137, 78 P.3d 671,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Wyo. 2003).

District court did not abuse its discretion in denying a father's motion to continue a divorce proceeding because: (1) the matter had already been pending for quite some time; (2) the conflicts in the case were in large part due to the father keeping his son against court order; and (3) the father had been aware that the court date was upcoming and had been granted at least one continuance due to scheduling conflicts.
Dunsmore v. Dunsmore, 2007 WY 202, 173 P.3d 389,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 216

(Wyo. 2007).

Court reasonably concluded that continuance was not warranted.

With respect to the alleged failure of the opposing party to respond to discovery, the requested discovery was specious, unnecessary, untimely and, in effect, a stalling tactic. Regarding the movant's unavailability to attend trial, the movant had voluntarily accepted out-of-state employment, thereby creating the asserted need for a continuance. Inskeep v. Inskeep, 752 P.2d 434,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1988).

Costs. —

Under this section providing for continuances and costs thereof, trial court's action in taxing one-half of costs and expenses of party appearing ready for trial to party obtaining continuance when latter could have, but did not, notify former so that appearance need not have been made was not disturbed on appeal. Holbrook v. Continental Oil Co., 73 Wyo. 321, 278 P.2d 798,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1955).

Applied

in

United States v. Hunt, 513 F.2d 129,

1975 U.S. App. LEXIS 15543

(10th Cir. 1975); Jones v. Jones, 903 P.2d 545,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 1995).

Cited

in

Honan v. Honan, 809 P.2d 783,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 1991).

Am Jur 2d, ALR
and C.J.S. references. —

Continuance of case because of illness of expert witness. 18 A.L.R.6th 509.